Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the State Department  of Energy, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Energy planning and
innovation................................. $ 10,441,447
(2) Energy development services .... $ 4,250,388
(3) Nuclear safety and
emergency response .................. $ 179,870
(4) Administrative services ............ $ 979,574
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$105,948,313 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Department
of Energy.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$79,074,786 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected  or received by the State Department of
Energy.
SECTION 4. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the following expenditures by the
State Department of Energy are not limited:
(1) Expenditures for loans for small scale local energy projects; and
(2) Expenditures for debt service.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5518 (SB 5518-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5518 (SB 5518-A) Page 2